Wyoming, session 2025, HB0269.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 33-49-101, 33-49-102(a)(v), (vi) and
by creating new paragraphs (x) through (xv), 33-49-103(a)
and (b), 33-49-104, 33-49-106(a)(ii) by creating new
subparagraphs (D), (E) and (c), 33-49-107(b)(intro), (i),
(c)(intro), by creating new subsections (d) through (f) and
by amending and renumbering (e) as (g), 33-49-108 by
HB0269

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0432
creating new subsections (b) and (c) and by amending and
renumbering (b) and (c) as (d) and (e),
33-49-109(a)(intro), (i), (iii) and by creating new
paragraphs (v) through (ix), 33-49-111(a)(intro), (i),
(iii), (v), (b) and (c) and 33-49-112(b) and (d) are
amended to read:

CHAPTER 49
ACUPUNCTURE PRACTICE AND NATUROPATHIC MEDICINE ACT

33-49-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the
"Wyoming Acupuncture Practice and Naturopathic Medicine
Act".

33-49-102. Definitions.

(a) As used in this chapter:

(v) "Board" means the Wyoming board of
acupuncture and naturopathic medicine created under this
chapter;
HB0269

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0432

(vi) "License to practice acupuncture" means a
license to practice acupuncture in this state issued by the
board pursuant to this chapter and consistent with the
scope of practice a person is qualified to perform as a
result of their NCCAOM diplomate status, post graduate
training, NADA certificate of training completion or as
otherwise authorized by the board;

(x) "Approved naturopathic medical program"
means a naturopathic medical education program in the
United States or Canada that provides the degree of doctor
of naturopathy or doctor of naturopathic medicine, that
includes graduate level, full-time, didactic and supervised
clinical training and is either accredited or has achieved
candidacy status for accreditation by the nationally
recognized accrediting body Council on Naturopathic Medical
Education for naturopathic medical programs;

(xi) "CNME" means the Council on Naturopathic
Medical Education or its successor organization that
substantially meets the same educational standards as CNME;

HB0269

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0432
(xii) "License to practice naturopathic
medicine" means a license to practice naturopathic medicine
consistent with the scope of practice a person is qualified
to perform as a result of the person's post graduate
education, NABNE exam, experience and continuing competence
or as otherwise authorized by the board;

(xiii) "Licensed naturopathic physician" means a
person authorized and licensed to practice naturopathic
medicine under this chapter;

(xiv) "NABNE" means the North American Board of
Naturopathic Examiners or its successor organization;

(xv) "Naturopathic medicine" means a system of
healthcare for the prevention, diagnosis and treatment of
human health conditions, injury and disease, the promotion
of health and the support and stimulation of a patient's
inherent self-healing processes through patient education
through the use of naturopathic therapies and therapeutic
substances.

HB0269

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0432
33-49-103. Board created; members; appointment;
terms; qualification; removal; vacancies.

(a) The Wyoming board of acupuncture and naturopathic
medicine is created to implement and administer the
provisions of this chapter. The board shall consist of five
(5) nine (9) members who are legal residents of Wyoming.
The board shall consist of one (1) member two (2) members
of the public, one (1) member who is two (2) members who
are NCCAOM certified, two (2) members who have one (1)
member who has been engaged in the practice of acupuncture
for a period of not less than five (5) years immediately
preceding appointment to the initial board, three (3)
members who are naturopathic physicians who are graduates
of a CNME accredited program and who have passed a NABNE
naturopathic licensing examination and one (1) member who
is a health care professional licensed pursuant to this
title other than this chapter.

(b) The governor shall appoint the members of the
board. Of the initial members appointed to the board, two
(2) who are not naturopathic physicians, three (3) members
shall be appointed for a term of two (2) years and three
HB0269

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0432
(3) members shall be appointed for a term of four (4)
years. Of the initially appointed naturopathic physician
members two (2) shall be appointed for a term of two years
and one (1) shall be appointed for a term of four (4)
years. Thereafter, the terms of office shall be four (4)
years. Each member shall serve until the member's successor
is appointed and qualified. No member shall serve more than
two (2) consecutive full terms.

33-49-104. Board meetings; elections; quorum.

The board shall meet at least once each year and elect a
chairman at the first meeting each year. The board may
convene at the request of the chairman or as determined by
the board for any other meeting as may be deemed necessary
to transact its business. Meetings may be carried out via
telecommunications. Three (3) Five (5) board members shall
constitute a quorum.

33-49-106. Board responsibilities and duties.

(a) The board shall:

HB0269

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0432
(ii) Determine the following standards for
licensees:

(D) Scope of practice;

(E) Practice standards.

(c) All fees collected by the board shall be
deposited by the state treasurer to the credit of the
Wyoming board of acupuncture and naturopathic medicine
account. Disbursements from the account shall not exceed
the monies credited to it. The account shall be used by the
board to defray costs incurred in the administration of
this chapter.

33-49-107. Licensure required; components;
exemptions; other licensed health care professionals.

(b) Any license to practice acupuncture or
naturopathic medicine issued under this chapter shall:

(i) Be issued in the name of the licensed
acupuncturist or naturopathic physician;
HB0269

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0432

(c) The following persons are exempt from this
chapter's licensure license to practice acupuncture
requirements:

(d) Beginning January 1, 2026, unless the person is
licensed to practice naturopathic medicine under this
chapter, no person shall:

(i) Practice, attempt or offer to practice
naturopathic medicine without a valid, unexpired, unrevoked
and unsuspended license issued under this chapter;

(ii) Represent oneself as licensed to practice
naturopathic medicine or hold himself out to be a "licensed
Naturopathic Physician," "licensed Physician of
Naturopathic Medicine," "licensed Naturopathic Doctor,"
"Naturopathic Doctor," "Naturopath," or "ND";

(iii) Use any words, abbreviations, figures,
configuration of letters including N.D. or N.M.D., titles,
signs, cards or devices tending to imply that the person is
HB0269

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0432
a licensed naturopathic physician unless the person is
licensed.

(e) The following persons are exempt from this
chapter's license to practice naturopathic medicine
requirements:

(i) A naturopathic physician licensed to
practice naturopathic medicine in another jurisdiction
while teaching, demonstrating or providing naturopathic
medicine in connection with teaching or participating in an
educational seminar in Wyoming. Any exemption under this
paragraph shall not exceed sixty (60) days cumulatively in
one (1) calendar year;

(ii) A naturopathic physician licensed in
another jurisdiction who enters this state to provide
naturopathic medicine during a natural disaster or a public
health emergency, as declared by the governor under W.S.
35-4-115(a)(i);

(iii) With board approval, a person in training
may practice naturopathic medicine provided all services
HB0269

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0432
are performed under the direct supervision of a licensed
naturopathic physician;

(iv) A student enrolled in an approved
naturopathic medical educational program, provided that the
practice of naturopathic medicine by a student is performed
pursuant to a course of instruction or an assignment from
an instructor and under the supervision of the instructor
who is a licensee or a duly licensed professional in the
instructed field.

(f) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to
prohibit or restrict:

(i) Any other licensed, certified or registered
health care provider in this state from practicing
naturopathic medicine within the provider's authorized
scope of practice;

(ii) Any person that sells a vitamin or herb
from providing information about the vitamin or herb;

HB0269

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0432
(iii) Any person who is licensed to practice
naturopathic medicine in another jurisdiction and who
enters this state to consult with a naturopathic physician
of this state, provided that the consultation is limited to
examination, recommendation or testimony in litigation; or

(iv) Any person who is not licensed as a
naturopathic physician from recommending ayurvedic
medicine, herbal remedies, nutritional advice, homeopathy
or other therapy.

(e)(g) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to
prohibit or restrict any other licensed health care
provider in this state from practicing acupuncture within
their statutory scope of practice. However, no person may
represent themselves as an acupuncturist in any manner
unless licensed to practice acupuncture in accordance with
this chapter.

33-49-108. Application for license; renewal and
reinstatement; qualifications; fees; reporting.

HB0269

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0432
(b) An applicant for licensure to practice
naturopathic medicine under this chapter shall:

(i) Submit a written application verified by
oath in a form the board prescribes;

(ii) Submit proof that the applicant:

(A) Is a graduate of an approved
naturopathic medical program and has successfully passed a
competency based national naturopathic physician licensing
examination administered by the NABNE or other organization
the board approves that is nationally recognized to
administer a naturopathic physician licensing examination
that represents federal standards of education and
training; or

(B) Was previously licensed or certified in
another jurisdiction, provided that when the applicant
secured initial licensure or certification, the
requirements for licensure or certification met standards
that the board determines are substantively comparable to
existing standards and that the license or certificate was
HB0269

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0432
not suspended, revoked or otherwise restricted for any
reason.

(iii) Have committed no acts that are grounds
for disciplinary action as set forth in W.S. 33-49-111, or
if an act has been committed, the board has, at its
discretion and after investigation, determined that
sufficient restitution has been made;

(iv) Remit fees as the board specifies;

(v) Meet any additional requirements that the
board may impose by rule.

(c) An applicant for licensure under this act shall
provide the board with fingerprints and other information
necessary for a criminal history background check as
provided under W.S. 7-19-201.

(b)(d) Licenses to practice acupuncture or
naturopathic medicine shall be renewed or reinstated
according to a schedule established by the board pursuant
to this chapter. If a licensee fails to renew a license to
HB0269

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0432
practice acupuncture or naturopathic medicine pursuant to
the schedule established by the board, the license shall
expire and the licensee shall not practice acupuncture or
naturopathic medicine in this state.

(c)(e) An applicant for licensure or licensee shall
report any pending or final administrative or disciplinary
actions, or other judgments, as well as the terms of any
settlement or other disposition of an action or judgment,
against the applicant or licensee involving malpractice or
improper practice of acupuncture or naturopathic medicine,
whether occurring in Wyoming or in any other jurisdiction
upon application for licensure, renewal or reinstatement,
or not later than thirty (30) days after the licensee
becomes aware of such actions or judgments.

33-49-109. Licensure by endorsement.

(a) The board may issue a license by endorsement to
practice acupuncture or naturopathic medicine in Wyoming to
an applicant who is licensed to practice acupuncture or
naturopathic medicine in another state subject to the
following:
HB0269

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0432

(i) The other state shall have substantially
equivalent acupuncture or naturopathic physician licensure
requirements as Wyoming, including similar licensure by
endorsement provisions for licensees of this state;

(iii) The applicant shall not have had a license
to practice acupuncture or naturopathic medicine suspended
or revoked in this state or any other; and

(v) The applicant shall complete an application
for licensure by endorsement in a form the board
prescribes;

(vi) The applicant shall remit fees as the board
specifies;

(vii) The applicant shall not have committed any
acts that are grounds for disciplinary action as set forth
in W.S. 33-49-111, or if an act has been committed, the
board may, at its discretion and after investigation,
determine that sufficient restitution has been made;

HB0269

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0432
(viii) If required by board rule, the applicant
shall have completed to the satisfaction of a majority of
board members a personal interview consisting of inquiry
and oral response to acupuncture or naturopathic knowledge,
personal and professional history and intentions for
practicing acupuncture or naturopathic medicine in this
state;

(ix) The applicant shall meet any additional
requirements that the board may impose by rule.

33-49-111. Disciplinary action; suspension and
revocation of license; application for reinstatement.

(a) After any hearing conducted pursuant to W.S.
33-49-110, the board may approve, deny, suspend, revoke or
refuse to renew a license to practice acupuncture or
naturopathic medicine or impose probationary conditions on
the license if the licensee or applicant has engaged in
unprofessional conduct. For purposes of this section,
unprofessional conduct includes any of the following:

HB0269

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0432
(i) Obtaining a license to practice acupuncture
or naturopathic medicine by means of fraud,
misrepresentation or concealment of material facts;

(iii) Being convicted of a felony that relates
to the practice of acupuncture or naturopathic medicine or
to the ability to practice acupuncture or naturopathic
medicine;

(v) Being negligent in the practice of
acupuncture or naturopathic medicine;

(b) An application for reinstatement may be made to
the board not earlier than one (1) year after the date of
the revocation of the license to practice acupuncture or
naturopathic medicine. The board may accept or reject an
application for reinstatement and may hold a hearing to
consider reinstatement. An applicant for reinstatement
aggrieved by any final action of the board may appeal to
the district court pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative
Procedure Act.

HB0269

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0432
(c) Upon receipt from the department of family
services of a certified copy of an order from a court to
withhold, suspend or otherwise restrict a license to
practice acupuncture or naturopathic medicine issued by the
board, the board shall notify the party named in the court
order of the withholding, suspension or restriction of the
license in accordance with the terms of the court order. No
appeal under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act shall
be allowed for a license withheld, suspended or restricted
under this subsection.

33-49-112. Violations; penalties; proceedings.

(b) The attorney general, the board, any county or
district attorney or any citizen may obtain an injunction
in the name of the state of Wyoming upon the relation of a
complainant enjoining any person from engaging in the
practice of acupuncture or naturopathic medicine without a
license. The district court of the district in which the
offending person resides or the district court of Laramie
county has original jurisdiction of any such injunction
proceedings. An injunction may be issued without proof of
actual damage sustained and upon proof of one (1) or more
HB0269

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0432
acts constituting the practice of acupuncture or
naturopathic medicine without a license. The standard of
proof of any violation of this subsection shall be by a
preponderance of the evidence.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this
chapter, the Wyoming Acupuncture Practice and Naturopathic
Medicine Act shall not apply to persons licensed under
title 33, chapter 25 or chapter 26 of the Wyoming statutes.

Section 2. The Wyoming board of acupuncture and
naturopathic medicine shall promulgate all rules necessary
to implement this act.

HB0269

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0432
Section 3.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2025.

(b) Sections 2 and 3 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
HB0269